Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1734
Collection of taxes; entry on tax list of refunds.

When the county treasurer refunds taxes pursuant to authority provided by law, he or she shall enter opposite such taxes in the tax list the words Erroneously taxed — refunded.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 162, p. 447;

R.S.1913, § 6491;

C.S.1922, § 6018;

C.S.1929, § 77-1923;

R.S.1943, § 77-1734;

Laws 1955, c. 297, § 1, p. 931;

Laws 2002, LB 994, § 23.